Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAPITOL TUNNEL.new text end new text begin $8,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to design, construct, and equip improvements to bring a portion of the tunnel under Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard and to the east to the State Capitol into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end